Hawaii statutes.
§264-88 Injunction. The department of
transportation may apply to the circuit court in the county in which the
junkyards may be located for an injunction to abate the nuisance of a
nonconforming junkyard. [L 1966, c 46, pt of §2; HRS §264-88]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next